ja: ソーダメーカー関連の付属品: 炭酸ボンベ; 再利用可能なボトル; ソーダメーカーユニット; シロップ; その他
sk-SK: Vrátane príslušenstva na výrobu sódy: Sýtiaca fľaša; Opätovne použiteľná fľaša; Jednotka na výrobu sódy; Sirup; Iné
de: Inbegriffenes Trinkwassersprudler-Zubehör: CO2-Zylinder; Wiederverwendbare Flasche; Wassersprudler; Sirup; Sonstiges
ru: Аксессуары для сифонов для газирования воды в комплекте: Цилиндр для карбонизации; Многоразовая бутылка; Устройство для приготовления газировки; Сироп; Другое
pl: W zestawie akcesoria do syfonu: Cylinder nasycający; Butelka wielokrotnego użytku; Urządzenie do robienia napojów gazowanych; Syrop; Inne
it: Accessori per il gasatore inclusi: Cilindro per carbonatazione; Bottiglia riutilizzabile; Gasatore; Sciroppo; Altro
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za uređaj za gaziranje: Cilindar za gaziranje; Boca za višekratnu upotrebu; Jedinica za proizvodnju gaziranih pića; Sirup; Ostalo
sv: Tillbehör till kolsyremaskin ingår: Kolsyrande cylinder; Återanvändbar flaska; Sodamakerenhet; Sirap; Övrigt
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за машинка за производство на газирани напитки: Газиращ цилиндър; Бутилка за многократна употреба; Устройство за производство на сода; Сироп; Други
ko: 소다 메이커 액세서리 포함: 탄산화 실린더; 재사용 가능한 병; 소다 제조 장치; 시럽; 기타
fi: Mukana hiilihapotuslaitteen lisätarvikkeet: Hiilihapposylinteri; Uudelleenkäytettävä pullo; Hiilihapotuslaite; Siirappi; Muu
da: Sodavandsmaskinetilbehør inkluderet: Kulsyrecylinder; Genanvendelig flaske; Sodavandsmaskine; Sirup; Andet
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ παρασκευής αναψυκτικού: Κύλινδρος ενανθράκωσης; Επαναχρησιμοποιήσιμο μπουκάλι; Μονάδα παρασκευής σόδας; Σιρόπι; Άλλο
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับเครื่องทำน้ำอัดลมที่รวมอยู่: กระบอกอัดก๊าซ; ขวดแบบใช้ซ้ำได้; เครื่องทำโซดา; น้ำเชื่อม; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za pripravo sodavice: Karbonizacijski cilinder; Steklenica za večkratno uporabo; Enota za pripravo sodavice; Sirup; Drugo
pt-BR: Acessórios para máquina de refrigerante incluídos: Cilindro de carbonatação; Garrafa reutilizável; Unidade fabricante de refrigerante; Xarope; Outro
fr: Accessoires pour la machine à soda inclus: Cylindre de carbonatation; Bouteille réutilisable; Unité de fabrication de soda; Sirop; Autre
en: Soda maker accessories included: Carbonating cylinder; Reusable bottle; Soda maker unit; Syrup; Other
pt-PT: Acessórios para máquinas de gaseificação incluídos: Cilindro de carbonatação; Garrafa reutilizável; Unidade para fazer refrigerante; Xarope; Outro
zh-CN: 包括汽水机配件: 充气气瓶; 可重复使用的瓶子; 汽水机; 糖浆; 其他
nb: Brusmaskintilbehør inkludert: Karbonerende sylinder; Gjenbrukbar flaske; Brusmaskin; Sirup; Annet
ro-RO: Accesorii aparat pentru preparat sifon incluse: Butelie de carbonatare; Sticlă reutilizabilă; Unitate de fabricare a sifonului; Sirop; Altele
es: Accesorios para máquina de refrescos incluidos: Cilindro carbonatador; Botella reutilizable; Unidad fabricadora de refrescos; Sirope; Otros
vi: Phụ kiện máy làm soda đi kèm: Xi-lanh cacbon hóa; Chai tái sử dụng; Máy pha soda; Si-rô; Khác
hu: Mellékelt szódagéptartozékok: Karbonizáló henger; Újrafelhasználható palack; Szódakészítő egység; Szirup; Egyéb
nl: Accessoires voor frisdrankmachine inbegrepen: Koolzuurcilinder; Herbruikbare fles; Sodamaker; Siroop; Andere
tr: Soda makinesi aksesuarları dahil: Karbonatlama silindiri; Yeniden kullanılabilir şişe; Soda yapma ünitesi; Şurup; Diğer
cs: Obsažené příslušenství k výrobníkům perlivých nápojů: Karbonizační láhev; Opakovaně použitelná láhev; Výrobník sody; Sirupy; Jiné
zh-TW: 包括氣泡水機配件: 碳化缸; 可重複使用瓶; 汽水機; 糖漿; 其他
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys gazuotų gėrimų gaminimo aparato priedai: Karbonizuojantis cilindras; Daugkartinio naudojimo buteliukas; Gėrimų gaminimo aparatas; Sirupas; Kita